Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 11. Nominations.

§ 23-15-291.
Nomination for state, district, county and county district office to be by primary election.

All nominations for state, district, county and county district officers made by the different parties of this state shall be made by primary elections. All primary elections shall be governed and regulated by the election laws of the state in force at the time the primary election is held.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3105 [Codes, 1906, § 3697; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6388; 1930, § 5864; repealed, Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 87, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-293.
Voting for and nomination of candidates for state, state district and legislative offices by counties or parts of counties within the districts.

Candidates for state, state district and legislative offices shall be voted for and nominated by all the counties or parts of counties within their respective districts, and all the district nominations shall be under the supervision and control of the state executive committee of the respective political parties, which committees shall discharge in respect to such state district nominations all the powers and duties imposed upon them in connection with nominations of candidates for other state officers.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3147 [Codes, 1906, § 3723; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6414; 1930, § 5900; repealed, Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 88; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-295.
Withdrawal of candidate.

When any person has qualified in the manner provided by law as a candidate for party nomination in any primary election, such person shall have the right to withdraw his or her name as a candidate by giving notice of his or her withdrawal in writing to the secretary of the proper executive committee at any time before the printing of the official ballots, and in the event of such withdrawal the name of the candidate shall not be printed on the ballot. When a candidate for party nomination for a state or district office who has qualified with the state executive committee withdraws as a candidate as is herein set forth after the sample of the official ballot has been approved and certified by the state executive committee the secretary or chair of the State Executive Committee shall forthwith notify the county executive committee of each county affected or involved of the fact of the withdrawal and such notification shall authorize the county executive committees to omit the name of the withdrawn candidate from the ballot if such notification is received before the printing of the ballot. In the case of the withdrawal of any candidate, the fee paid by the candidate shall be retained by the state or county executive committee, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-31 [Codes, 1942, § 3118.7; Laws, 1952, ch. 294; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 89; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 175, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-296.
Written notification to Secretary of State.

All political parties registered with the Secretary of State shall notify the Secretary of State in writing within two (2) working days of each qualifying deadline of the name, mailing address and office sought of all candidates for statewide, state district and legislative office who have submitted qualifying papers to the political party on or before the qualifying deadline, and all political parties shall notify the Secretary of State of any such candidate who withdraws his candidacy within two (2) working days of receiving written notice of the withdrawal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 6; Laws, 2010, ch. 320, § 1, eff July 15, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-297.
Fee required to be paid upon entering race for party nomination.

All candidates upon entering the race for party nominations for office shall first pay to the proper officer as provided for in Section 23-15-299 for each primary election and all independent candidates and special election candidates shall pay to the proper officer as provided for in Section 23-15-299 the following amounts:

Candidates for Governor, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

Candidates for Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, State Highway Commissioner and State Public Service Commissioner, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

Candidates for district attorney, State Senator and State Representative, Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).

Candidates for sheriff, chancery clerk, circuit clerk, tax assessor, tax collector, county attorney, county superintendent of education and board of supervisors, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Candidates for county surveyor, county coroner, justice court judge and constable, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Candidates for United States Senator, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

Candidates for United States Representative, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-33 [Codes, 1906, § 3718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6410; 1930, § 5878; 1942, § 3120; Laws, 1936, ch. 326; Laws, 1962, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 508, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 90; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 89; Laws, 1996, ch. 301, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 23-15-299.
Time for payment of fee; written statement to accompany fee; recordation and disbursement of fee; determination of candidate’s qualifications; declaration of nominee in single candidate race.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. If March 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. If March 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of Section 23-15-297, shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the circuit clerk of that candidate’s county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the election for the office is held. If March 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county executive committee within two (2) business days. No candidate may attempt to qualify with any political party that does not have a duly organized county executive committee, and the circuit clerk shall not accept any assessments paid for nonlegislative offices pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of Section 23-15-297 if the circuit clerk does not have contact information for the secretary of the county executive committee for that political party.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of Section 23-15-297 shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the circuit clerk of that candidate’s county of residence by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held or on the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office, whichever is earlier; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. If March 1 or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The circuit clerk shall forward the fee and all necessary information to the secretary of the proper county election commission within two (2) business days.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. sixty (60) days before the presidential preference primary in years in which a presidential preference primary is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297, in years when a presidential preference primary is not being held, shall be paid by each candidate who seeks a nomination in the political party election to the secretary of the state executive committee with which the candidate is affiliated by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. If sixty (60) days before the presidential preference primary in years in which a presidential preference primary is held, March 1, or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (a) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297 must be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. sixty (60) days before the presidential preference primary in years in which a presidential preference primary is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. Assessments made pursuant to paragraphs (f) and (g) of Section 23-15-297, in years when a presidential preference primary is not being held, shall be paid by each independent candidate or special election candidate to the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. on March 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held; however, no such assessments may be paid before January 1 of the year in which the primary election for the office is held. If sixty (60) days before the presidential preference primary in years in which a presidential preference primary is held, March 1, or the date of the qualifying deadline provided by statute for the office occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, then the assessments required to be paid by this paragraph (b) shall be paid by 5:00 p.m. on the business day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday.

The fees paid pursuant to subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be accompanied by a written statement containing the name and address of the candidate, the party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office for which he or she is a candidate.

The state executive committee shall transmit to the Secretary of State a copy of the written statements accompanying the fees paid pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. All copies must be received by the Office of the Secretary of State by not later than 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline; provided, however, the failure of the Office of the Secretary of State to receive such copies by 6:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not affect the qualification of a person who pays the required fee and files the required statement by 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline. The name of any person who pays the required fee and files the required statement after 5:00 p.m. on the date of the qualifying deadline shall not be placed on the primary election ballot or the general election ballot.

The Secretary of State or the secretary or circuit clerk to whom such payments are made shall promptly receipt for same stating the office for which the candidate making payment is running and the political party with which he or she is affiliated, if applicable, and he or she shall keep an itemized account in detail showing the exact time and date of the receipt of each payment received by him or her and, where applicable, the date of the postmark on the envelope containing the fee and from whom, and for what office the party paying same is a candidate.

The secretaries of the proper executive committee shall hold the funds to be finally disposed of by order of their respective executive committees. The funds may be used or disbursed by the executive committee receiving same to pay all necessary traveling or other necessary expenses of the members of the executive committee incurred in discharging their duties as committee members, and of their secretary and may pay the secretary such salary as may be reasonable. The Secretary of State shall deposit any qualifying fees received from candidates into the Elections Support Fund established in Section 23-15-5.

Upon receipt of the proper fee and all necessary information, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall then determine at the time of the qualifying deadline, unless otherwise provided by law, whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the state, state district, county or county district which they seek to serve, and whether each candidate meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office. The proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall determine whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election. The committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, shall also determine whether any candidate has been convicted (i) of any felony in a court of this state, (ii) on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, (iii) of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992, or (iv) of any offense that involved the misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office. Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state.

If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, finds that a candidate either (i) is not a qualified elector, (ii) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, or (iii) has been convicted of a felony or other disqualifying offense as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and not pardoned, then the executive committee shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard. The executive committee shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms. If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove that he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of that candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot.

If the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken.

Where there is but one (1) candidate for each office contested at the primary election, the proper executive committee or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, when the time has expired within which the names of candidates shall be furnished shall declare such candidates the nominees.

No candidate may qualify by filing the information required by this section by using the Internet.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3118 [Codes, 1906, § 3715; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6407; 1930, § 5876; Laws, 1928, ch. 128; Laws, 1944, ch. 172; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 14; Laws, 1948, ch. 307; Laws, 1960, ch. 477; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346], and § 3121 [Codes, 1930, § 5879; Laws, 1944, ch. 170; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. Sess. ch 18; Laws, 1962, chs. 566, 567; Laws, 1976, ch. 481, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 91; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 604, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 362, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 23-15-300
Residency requirements for certain candidates for municipal, county or county district offices; applicability of section.

Any candidate for any municipal, county or county district office shall be a resident of the municipality, county, county district or other territory that he or she seeks to represent in such office for two (2) years immediately preceding the day of election. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any municipality with less than one thousand (1,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census.

A candidate shall prove in his or her qualifying information that he or she meets the applicable residency requirement or provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the residency requirement on or before the date of the election at which the candidate could be elected to office. The appropriate election official or executive committee, whichever is applicable, with whom a candidate files qualifying information shall review and determine whether the candidate meets the applicable residency requirement according to the procedures in Section 23-15-299. The appropriate election commission shall review and determine whether a candidate required to file qualifying information with it meets the applicable residency requirement according to the procedures in Section 23-15-359.

If the qualifications for an elected office include a specific residency requirement, the residency requirement in this section shall not apply.

This section shall apply to elections held from and after January 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 433, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 23-15-301.
Payment of election expenses.

All the expenses of printing the tickets or primary election ballots, for necessary stationery, and for paying the managers, clerks and returning officer of every primary election authorized by this chapter held in any county shall be paid by the board of supervisors of such county out of the general funds of the county, but such officers of primary elections shall receive only such compensation as is authorized by Section 23-15-227 to be paid managers, clerks and returning officer for like services in holding elections thereunder. However, this section shall not apply to the expenses of a primary election held by any political party which at either of the last two (2) preceding general elections for the office of Governor or either of the last two (2) preceding national elections for President of the United States did not vote as many as twenty percent (20%) of the total vote cast in the entire state.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-67 [Codes, 1906, § 3718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6410; 1930, § 5877; 1942, § 3119; Laws, 1966, ch. 610, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 507, § 1; repealed 1970, ch. 506, § 33; Laws, 1972, ch. 366, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 92, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-303.
Each political party or organization to hold independent primary election.

When two (2) or more political parties or political organizations are holding primary elections, each shall be conducted entirely independent of the other but at the same time.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3127 [Codes, 1930, § 5885; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 93; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 70, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-305.
Majority vote required for nomination; run-off elections.

The candidate who received the majority number of votes cast for the office which he seeks shall thereby become the nominee of his party for such office and no person shall be declared to be the nominee of his party unless and until he has received a majority of the votes cast for such office, except as hereinafter provided. If no candidate received such majority of the votes cast in the first primary, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes cast for such office shall have their names submitted as such candidates to the second primary and the candidate who leads in such second primary shall be nominated for the office.

If the candidate who received the second highest number of votes cast for such office for any reason declines to enter the second primary, then in that event the candidate who received the third highest shall have his name submitted to the second primary, together with the candidate who received the highest number of votes cast for such office.

If the candidate who received the third highest number of votes cast for such office for any reason declines to enter the second primary, then in that event the candidate who received the fourth highest shall have his name submitted to the second primary, together with the candidate who received the highest number of votes cast for such office.

If no candidate will enter the second primary with the candidate who received the highest number of votes cast, then the candidate who received the highest number of votes cast in the first primary shall be declared the nominee of his party for such office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-69 [Codes, 1942, § 3194; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 94, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-307.
Nomination as condition of being placed on general election ballot and holding office.

The name of any candidate shall not be placed upon the official ballot in general elections as a party nominee who is not nominated as herein provided, and the election of any party nominee who shall be nominated otherwise than as provided in this chapter shall be void and he or she shall not be entitled to hold the office to which he or she may have been elected.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3156 [Codes, 1906, § 3721; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6413; 1930, § 5909; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 95; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-309.
Nomination for elective municipal office to be made at primary election; fee requirements; determination of candidate’s qualifications.

Nominations for all municipal officers which are elective shall be made at a primary election, or elections, to be held in the manner prescribed by law. All persons desiring to be candidates for the nomination in the primary elections shall first pay Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the clerk of the municipality, at least sixty (60) days before the first primary election, no later than 5:00 p.m. on such deadline day. If the sixtieth day to file the fee and written statement before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the fees and written statements submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted.

The fee paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be accompanied by a written statement containing the name and address of the candidate, the party with which he or she is affiliated, the email address of the candidate, if any, and the office for which he or she is a candidate.

The clerk shall promptly receipt the payment, stating the office for which the person making the payment is running and the political party with which such person is affiliated. The clerk shall keep an itemized account in detail showing the time and date of the receipt of such payment received by him or her, from whom such payment was received, the party with which such person is affiliated and for what office the person paying the fee is a candidate. No candidate may attempt to qualify with any political party that does not have a duly organized municipal executive committee, and the municipal clerk shall not accept any assessments made pursuant to subsection (1) if the municipal clerk does not have contact information for the secretary of the municipal executive committee for that political party. The clerk shall promptly supply all necessary information and pay over all fees so received to the secretary of the proper municipal executive committee. The funds may be used and disbursed in the same manner as is allowed in Section 23-15-299 in regard to other executive committees.

Upon receipt of the above information, the proper municipal executive committee shall then determine, at the time of the qualifying deadline, whether each candidate is a qualified elector of the municipality, and of the ward if the office sought is a ward office, shall determine whether each candidate either meets all other qualifications to hold the office he or she is seeking or presents absolute proof that he or she will, subject to no contingencies, meet all qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected to office. The executive committee shall determine whether the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election. The committee also shall determine whether any candidate has been convicted of any felony in a court of this state, or has been convicted on or after December 8, 1992, of any offense in another state which is a felony under the laws of this state, or has been convicted of any felony in a federal court on or after December 8, 1992. Excepted from the above are convictions of manslaughter and violations of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any violations of the tax laws of this state unless such offense also involved misuse or abuse of his or her office or money coming into his or her hands by virtue of the office. If the proper municipal executive committee finds that a candidate either (a) does not meet all qualifications to hold the office he or she seeks and fails to provide absolute proof, subject to no contingencies, that he or she will meet the qualifications on or before the date of the general or special election at which he or she could be elected, or (b) has been convicted of a felony as described in this subsection and not pardoned, then the executive committee shall notify the candidate and give the candidate an opportunity to be heard. The executive committee shall mail notice to the candidate at least three (3) business days before the hearing to the address provided by the candidate on the qualifying forms, and the committee shall attempt to contact the candidate by telephone, email and facsimile if the candidate provided this information on the forms. If the candidate fails to appear at the hearing or to prove he or she meets all qualifications to hold the office subject to no contingencies, then the name of such candidate shall not be placed upon the ballot. If the executive committee determines that the candidate has taken the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office at the election, the action required by Section 23-15-905, shall be taken.

Where there is but one (1) candidate, the proper municipal executive committee when the time has expired within which the names of candidates shall be furnished shall declare such candidate the nominee.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3152 [Codes, 1906, § 3726; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6417; 1930, § 5905; Laws, 1910, ch. 209; Laws, 1950, ch. 499; Laws, 1952 ch. 379; Laws, 1982, chs. 477, § 3, 484, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 96; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 604, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-311.
Payment of municipal primary election expenses.

All the expenses of printing the tickets, paying the poll managers, clerks and returning officer of a municipal primary election shall be paid by the municipality from the general funds thereof, but such officers of primary elections shall receive only such compensation as is authorized by law or ordinance to be paid poll managers, clerks and returning officer for like services rendered in the general elections held in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-65 [Codes, 1930, § 5906; 1942, § 3153; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 97; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-313.
Selection of temporary executive committee in municipality not having party executive committee; notice to public; county executive committee to serve as municipal executive committee under certain circumstances; person convicted of felony barred from serving as member of municipal executive committee.

If there be any political party, or parties, in any municipality which shall not have a party executive committee for such municipality, such political party, or parties, shall within thirty (30) days of the date for which a candidate for a municipal office is required to qualify in that municipality select qualified electors of that municipality and of that party’s political faith to serve on a temporary municipal executive committee until members of a municipal executive committee are elected at the next regular election for executive committees.The temporary municipal executive committee shall be selected in the following manner:The chairman of the county executive committee of the party desiring to select a temporary municipal executive committee shall call, upon petition of five (5) or more members of that political faith, a mass meeting of the qualified electors of their political faith who reside in such municipality to meet at some convenient place within such municipality, at a time to be designated in the call, and at such mass convention the members of that political faith shall select a temporary municipal executive committee which shall serve until members of a municipal executive committee are elected at the next regular election for executive committees.The public shall be given notice of such mass meeting as provided in Section 23-15-315.The chairman of the county executive committee shall authorize the call within five (5) calendar days of receipt of the petition.If the chairman of the county executive committee is either incapacitated, unavailable or nonresponsive and does not authorize the mass call within five (5) calendar days of receipt of the petition, any elected officer of the county executive committee may authorize the call within five (5) calendar days.If no elected officer of the county executive committee acts to approve such petition after an additional five (5) calendar days from the date, the chair of the county executive committee not taking action as provided by this section, the petitioners shall be authorized to produce the call themselves.

If no municipal executive committee is selected or otherwise formed before an election, the county executive committee may serve as the temporary municipal executive committee and exercise all of the duties of the municipal executive committee for the municipal election.After a county executive committee has fulfilled its duties as the temporary municipal executive committee, as soon as practicable thereafter, the county executive committee shall select a municipal executive committee no later than before the next municipal election.

A person who has been convicted of a felony in a court of this state or any other state or a court of the United States, shall be barred from serving as a member of a municipal executive committee.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3154 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6418, 6419; 1930, § 5907; Laws, 1910, ch. 209; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 98; Laws, 2010, ch. 428, § 1, eff July 22, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-315.
Publication of notice to public.

The county executive committee chairman shall publish a copy of his call for a meeting in some newspaper published at least once per week in the municipality affected for three (3) weeks preceding the date set for the mass convention, or if there be no newspaper published in the municipality, then in some newspaper having general circulation in the municipality and by posting notices continuously in three (3) public places in the municipality, one (1) of which shall be city hall or be the regular location where the municipal governing authority meets to conduct business not less than three (3) weeks before the date for the mass convention.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3155 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6420; 1930, § 5908; Laws, 1910, ch. 209; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 99; Laws, 2010, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 391, § 2, eff August 1, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 23-15-317.
Nomination of nominee when vacancy in nomination occurs between primary election and general election; procedure for withdrawal based upon legitimate nonpolitical reason.

If any person nominated for office in a primary election shall die, be removed after his or her nomination or withdraw or resign from his or her candidacy for a legitimate nonpolitical reason as defined in this section, and the vacancy in nomination shall occur between the primary election and the ensuing general election, then the municipal, county or state executive committee with which the original nominee qualified as a candidate in the primary election shall nominate a nominee for such office. Where such a party nominee is unopposed each political party registered with the State Board of Election Commissioners shall have the privilege of nominating a candidate for the office involved. Such nominee shall be duly certified by the respective executive committee chair. Within two (2) days after such nomination is made by the appropriate executive committee, such committee shall formally notify the Secretary of State of the name of the nominee. The Secretary of State shall thereupon officially notify the appropriate officials charged with conducting the election for the office wherein the vacancy occurred of the name of the nominee. All nominations made pursuant to the provisions of this section shall have the same force and effect and shall entitle the nominees to all rights and privileges that would accrue to them as if they had been nominated in the regular primary election.

“Legitimate nonpolitical reason” as used in this section shall be limited to the following:

Reasons of health, which shall include any health condition which, in the written opinion of a medical doctor, would be harmful to the health of the candidate if he or she continued.

Family crises, which shall include circumstances which would substantially alter the duties and responsibilities of the candidate to the family or to a family business.

Substantial business conflict, which shall include the policy of an employer prohibiting employees being candidates for public offices and an employment change which would result in the ineligibility of the candidate or which would impair his or her capability to properly carry out the functions of the office being sought.

Any candidate who withdraws based upon a “legitimate nonpolitical reason” which is not covered by the above definition shall have the strict burden of proof for his or her reason.

A candidate who wishes to withdraw for a legitimate nonpolitical reason shall submit his or her reason by sworn affidavit. Such affidavit shall be filed with the state party chair of the nominee’s party and the State Board of Election Commissioners. No substitution of candidates shall be authorized, except for death or disqualification, unless the State Board of Election Commissioners approves the affidavit as constituting a “legitimate nonpolitical reason” for the candidate’s resignation within five (5) days of the date the affidavit is submitted to the board.

Immediately upon approval or disapproval of such affidavit, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall notify the respective executive committee of same.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-136 [Laws, 1984, ch. 439, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 100; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 176, eff from and after July 1, 2017.